California, session 20252026, AB2626.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 50406.4.7 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:50406.4.7. Notwithstanding any other law, to improve the fiscal integrity of a development financed with departmental resources, the department, in its sole discretion, may waive payment of residual receipts or minimum annual loan payments used to cover the cost of project monitoring required under a department regulatory agreement. agreement, based on the assessment by the department’s actual cost in combination with a project’s ability to pay.